Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BUILD WEALTH MN; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $4,634,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency to provide statewide access to the online rental education course Rent Smart, Wise and Ready through Build Wealth MN. The agency must use the money to purchase licenses for the Rent Smart, Wise and Ready curriculum for individuals and families seeking rental assistance and for households participating in subsidized housing programs. The agency must contract with Build Wealth MN, the developer and sole provider of the Rent Smart, Wise and Ready curriculum, to deliver and administer the program statewide. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end